Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5537DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5537DP (10) 91
ss/ko

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 89.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
89.9 Disposal of fees.
All fees provided for in this chapter shall be collected
by the director and remitted to the treasurer of state, to
be deposited in the licensing and regulation fund created in
section 10A.507, together with an itemized statement showing
the source of collection.
Sec. 2. Section 89.14, subsections 4 and 8, Code 2026, are
amended to read as follows:
4. The members of the board shall select a chairperson, vice
chairperson, and secretary from their membership. However,
neither the director nor the director’s designee shall serve
as chairperson. The board shall meet at least quarterly but
may meet as often as necessary. Meetings shall be set by a
majority of the board or upon the call of the chairperson,
or in the chairperson’s absence, upon the call of the vice
chairperson. A majority of the board members who are currently
serving shall constitute a quorum.
8. The board department shall establish fees for
examinations, inspections, annual statements, shop inspections,
and other services. The fees shall reflect the actual costs
and expenses necessary to operate the board and perform the
duties of the director.
Sec. 3. Section 89A.3, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code 2026,
is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 4. Section 89A.13, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
4. The members of the safety board shall select a
chairperson, vice chairperson, and a secretary from their
membership. However, neither the director nor the director’s
designee shall serve as chairperson. The safety board shall
meet at least quarterly but may meet as often as necessary.
Meetings shall be set by a majority of the safety board or upon
the call of the chairperson, or in the chairperson’s absence,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-1- ss/ko 1/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
upon the call of the vice chairperson. A majority of the
safety board members who are currently serving shall constitute
a quorum.
Sec. 5. Section 89A.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
89A.19 Fees.
1. The department shall set fees to be charged and collected
for inspections, permits, and commissions.
2. All fees collected by the director pursuant to this
chapter shall be remitted to the treasurer of state, to be
deposited in the licensing and regulation fund created in
section 10A.507.
Sec. 6. Section 103.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. “Apprentice electrician” means any person who, as such
person’s principal occupation, is engaged in learning and
assisting in the installation, alteration, and repair of
electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment as an employee
of a person licensed under this chapter, and who is licensed
by the board and is progressing toward completion of an
apprenticeship training program registered by the Iowa office
of apprenticeship or the office of apprenticeship of the United
States department of labor. For purposes of this chapter,
persons who are not engaged in the installation, alteration, or
repair of electrical wiring, apparatus, and equipment, either
inside or outside buildings, shall not be considered apprentice
electricians.
Sec. 7. Section 103.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026,
is amended to read as follows:
b. Meetings shall be called as needed by the chairperson
or four members of the board. At any meeting of the board, a
majority of board members who are currently serving constitutes
a quorum.
Sec. 8. Section 103.5, Code 2026, is amended by striking the
section and inserting in lieu thereof the following:
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-2- ss/ko 2/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
103.5 Form of license.
A license under this chapter shall be issued in the form of
a certificate under the seal of the department and signed by
the director.
Sec. 9. Section 103.6, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 2026,
is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 10. Section 103.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
103.7 Fees.
1. The department shall set fees to be charged and collected
for inspection and other services.
2. All licensing, examination, renewal, and inspection fees
under this chapter shall be deposited in the licensing and
regulation fund created in section 10A.507.
Sec. 11. Section 103.10A, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
103.10A Inactive master electrician license.
The board may by rule create an inactive master electrician
license and the department may establish a fee for such a
license. An applicant for an inactive master electrician
license shall, at a minimum, meet the requirements of this
chapter and requirements established by the board by rule
for licensure as a class A master electrician or a class
B master electrician. A person licensed as an inactive
master electrician shall not be authorized to act as a master
electrician, but shall be authorized to apply for a class A
master electrician license or a class B master electrician
license at a future date subject to conditions and under
procedures established by the board by rule. The conditions
and procedures shall include but not be limited to completion
of the required number of contact hours of continuing education
courses specified in section 103.18, and paying the applicable
license fee specified in section 103.19 for a class A master
electrician license or class B master electrician license.
Sec. 12. Section 103.15, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-3- ss/ko 3/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to read as follows:
1. A person shall be licensed by the board and pay a
licensing fee to work as an apprentice electrician while
participating in an apprenticeship training program registered
by the Iowa office of apprenticeship or the office of
apprenticeship of the United States department of labor in
accordance with the standards established by that department
office. An apprenticeship shall be limited to six years from
the date of licensure, unless extended by the board upon a
finding that a hardship existed which prevented completion of
the apprenticeship program. Such licensure shall entitle the
licensee to act as an apprentice to an electrical contractor,
a class A master electrician, a class B master electrician,
a class A journeyman electrician, or a class B journeyman
electrician as provided in subsection 3.
Sec. 13. Section 103.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
103.18 License renewal —— continuing education.
In order to renew a class A master electrician license, class
B master electrician license, class A journeyman electrician
license, or class B journeyman electrician license issued
pursuant to this chapter, the licensee shall be required to
complete eighteen contact hours of continuing education courses
approved by the board during the three-year period for which a
license is granted. The contact hours shall include a minimum
of six contact hours studying the national electrical code
described in section 103.6, and the remaining contact hours may
include study of electrical circuit theory, blueprint reading,
transformer and motor theory, electrical circuits and devices,
control systems, programmable controllers, and microcomputers
or any other study of electrical-related material that is
approved by the board. Any additional hours studying the
national electrical code shall be acceptable. For purposes of
this section, “contact hour” means fifty minutes of classroom
attendance at an approved course under a qualified instructor
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-4- ss/ko 4/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
approved by the board.
Sec. 14. Section 103.19, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
103.19 Licenses —— expiration —— application —— fees.
1. Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall
expire every three years, with the exception of licenses for
apprentice electricians and unclassified persons, which shall
expire on an annual basis as determined by the department by
rule. All license applications shall include the applicant’s
social security number, which shall be maintained as a
confidential record and shall be redacted prior to public
release of an application or other record containing such
social security number. The board department shall establish
the fees to be payable for license issuance, reactivation,
reinstatement, and renewal in amounts not to exceed the
following:
a. For each year of the three-year license period for
issuance and renewal:
(1) Electrical contractor, one hundred twenty-five dollars.
(2) Class A master electrician, class B master electrician,
residential master electrician, one hundred twenty-five
dollars.
(3) Class A journeyman electrician, class B journeyman
electrician, residential electrician, or special electrician,
twenty-five dollars.
b. For apprentice electricians or unclassified persons,
twenty dollars.
2. The holder of an expired license may renew the license
for during a period of three months from the date of expiration
determined by the department by rule upon payment of the
license fee plus ten percent of the renewal fee for each month
or portion thereof past the expiration date a penalty as
determined by the department by rule. All holders of licenses
expired for more than three months shall apply for a new
license.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-5- ss/ko 5/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
3. If the board determines that all licenses shall expire
on the same date every three years for licenses specified in
subsection 1, paragraph “a”, the license fees shall be prorated
by month. The board shall determine an individual’s license
fee based on the number of months that the individual’s license
will be in effect after being issued and prior to expiration
A licensee whose license has been revoked, suspended,
or voluntarily surrendered must apply for and receive
reinstatement of the license, as provided by the board by rule,
prior to practicing a profession licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 15. Section 103.23, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. All new electrical installations for single-family
residential applications requiring new electrical service
equipment.
Sec. 16. Section 103.25, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
103.25 Request for inspection —— fees.
1. At or before commencement of any installation required
to be inspected by the board, the licensee or property owner
making such installation shall submit to the department a
request for inspection. The board department shall prescribe
by rule the methods by which the request may be submitted,
which may include electronic submission or through a form
prescribed by the board that can be submitted either through
the mail or by a fax transmission. The board shall also
prescribe methods by which inspection fees can be paid, which
may include electronic methods of payment and the manner in
which fees may be paid. If the board or the department becomes
aware that a person has failed to file a necessary request for
inspection, the board shall send a written notification by
certified mail that the request must be filed within fourteen
days. Any person filing a late request for inspection shall
pay a delinquency fee in an amount to be determined by the
board department. A person who fails to file a late request
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-6- ss/ko 6/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
within fourteen days from receipt of the notification shall be
subject to a civil penalty to be determined by the board by
rule.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the board may by rule
provide for the issuance of a single permit to a licensee
to request multiple inspections. The permit authorizes the
licensee to perform new electrical installations specified in
the permit. The board department shall prescribe the methods
by which the request for multiple inspections may be submitted,
which may include electronic submission or through a form
prescribed by the board that can be submitted either through
the mail or by a fax transmission and the manner in which fees
may be paid. The board shall also prescribe methods by which
inspection fees can be paid, which may include electronic
methods of payment. The board may perform inspections of
each new electrical installation or any portion of the total
number of new electrical installations made under each permit.
The board department shall establish fees for such permits,
which shall not exceed the total inspection fees that would be
required if each new electrical installation performed under
the request for multiple inspections had been performed under
individual requests for inspections as provided in subsection
1.
Sec. 17. Section 103.31, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
6. The board shall establish an internet-based licensure
verification database for access by a state or local inspector
for verification of licensee status. The database shall
include the name of every person licensed under this chapter
and a corresponding licensure number. However, the licensee’s
home address, home telephone number, and other personal
information as determined by rule shall be confidential.
Inspectors shall be authorized to request the name and
license number of any person working at a job site subject to
inspection for verification of licensee status. Licensees
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-7- ss/ko 7/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
under this chapter shall be required to carry a copy of their
current license and photo identification at all times when
employed on a job site for compliance with this subsection.
Sec. 18. Section 103.32, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. All state electrical inspection fees shall be due and
payable to the board department at or before commencement of
the installation and shall be forwarded with the request for
inspection. Inspection fees provided in this section shall
not apply within the jurisdiction of any political subdivision
if the political subdivision has adopted an ordinance or
resolution pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 19. Section 103.32, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
The board department shall establish the fees for
inspections in amounts not to exceed:
Sec. 20. Section 103.34, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Upon receipt of a notice of appeal filed pursuant to
section 103.33, the chairperson director or administrative
staff of the board department may designate a hearing officer
from among the board members, or an administrative law judge
employed by the department, to hear the appeal or may set the
matter for hearing before the full board at its next scheduled
meeting. A majority of the board shall make the decision.
Sec. 21. Section 105.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. “Apprentice” means any person, other than a helper,
journeyperson, or master, who, as a principal occupation, is
engaged in working as an employee of a plumbing, mechanical,
HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic systems contractor
under the supervision of either a master or a journeyperson and
is progressing toward completion of an apprenticeship training
program registered by the Iowa office of apprenticeship or the
office of apprenticeship of the United States department of
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-8- ss/ko 8/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
labor while learning and assisting in the design, installation,
and repair of plumbing, HVAC, refrigeration, sheet metal, or
hydronic systems, as applicable.
Sec. 22. Section 105.3, subsection 2, paragraph a,
subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2026, are amended by striking
the subparagraphs.
Sec. 23. Section 105.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
5. The board shall organize annually and shall select a
chairperson and a secretary from its membership. A quorum
shall consist of a majority of the board members of the board
who are currently serving.
Sec. 24. Section 105.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Any person desiring to take an examination for a license
issued pursuant to this chapter shall make application to
the board in accordance with the rules of the board. The
application form shall be no longer than two pages in length,
plus one security page. The board may require that a recent
photograph of the applicant be attached to the application.
Sec. 25. Section 105.9, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are
amended to read as follows:
1. The board department shall set the fees for the
examination of all applicants, by rule, which fees shall be
based upon the cost of administering the examinations.
2. The board department shall set the license fees and
renewal fees for all licenses issued pursuant to this chapter,
by rule.
Sec. 26. Section 105.9, subsections 5, 6, and 7, Code 2026,
are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 27. Section 105.15, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
105.15 Registry of licenses.
The name, location, license number, and date of issuance
of the license of each person to whom a license has been
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-9- ss/ko 9/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
issued shall be entered in a registry kept in the office
of the department to be known as the plumbing, mechanical,
HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic registry. The
registry may be electronic and shall be open to public
inspection. However, the licensee’s home address, home
telephone number, and other personal information as determined
by rule shall be confidential.
Sec. 28. Section 105.16, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
105.16 Change of residence.
If a person licensed to practice as a contractor or a
plumbing, mechanical, HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or
hydronic professional under this chapter changes the person’s
residence or place of practice, the person shall so notify the
board department.
Sec. 29. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph a,
subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Be enrolled in an applicable apprentice program which is
registered with the United States department of labor office of
apprenticeship or the Iowa office of apprenticeship.
Sec. 30. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph b,
subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (c), Code
2026, are amended to read as follows:
(a) File an application and pay application fees as
established by the board department, which application shall
establish that the person meets the minimum educational and
experience requirements adopted by the board.
(c) Provide the board with evidence of having completed
at least four years of practical experience as an apprentice.
Commencing January 1, 2010 2027, the four years of practical
experience required by this subparagraph division must be
an apprenticeship training program registered by the United
States department of labor Iowa workforce development office
of apprenticeship.
Sec. 31. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph c,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-10- ss/ko 10/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
(a) File an application and pay application fees as
established by the board department, which application shall
establish that the person meets the minimum educational and
experience requirements adopted by the board.
Sec. 32. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph d,
subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
(1) File an application and pay application fees as
established by the board department and establish that the
person meets the minimum requirements adopted by the board.
Through June 30, 2017, the application shall include the
person’s state contractor registration number. After July
1, 2017, the The application shall include proof of workers
compensation insurance coverage, proof of unemployment
insurance compliance, and, for out-of-state contractors, a bond
as described in chapter 91C.
Sec. 33. Section 105.18, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
c. The board shall department may establish a special,
restricted license fee at a reduced rate, consistent with any
other special, restricted license fees.
Sec. 34. Section 105.20, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
105.20 Renewal and reinstatement of licenses —— fees and
penalties —— continuing education.
1. All licenses issued under this chapter shall be issued
for a three-year period as determined by the department by
rule.
2. A license issued under this chapter may be renewed
as provided by rule adopted by the board department upon
application by the licensee, without examination. Applications
for renewal shall be made to the board department, accompanied
by the required renewal licensing fee, at least thirty days
prior to the expiration date of the license and submitted
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-11- ss/ko 11/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
during a period as determined by the department by rule.
3. Failure to renew a license within a reasonable time after
the expiration of the license shall not invalidate the license,
but a reasonable penalty may be assessed as adopted by rule,
in addition to the license renewal fee, to allow reinstatement
of the license A licensee may renew an inactive or lapsed
license by submitting a reactivation fee and completing other
requirements as determined by the board by rule.
4. The board shall, by rule, establish a reinstatement
process for a licensee who allows a license to lapse, including
reasonable penalties as determined by the department by rule.
5. a. The basic continuing education requirement for
renewal of a license shall be the completion, during the
immediately preceding license term, of the number of classroom
hours of instruction required by the board in courses or
seminars which have been approved by the board. The board
shall require at least eight classroom hours of instruction
during each three-year licensing term.
b. A licensee shall have a thirty-day grace period, as
determined by the department by rule, after expiration of the
licensing term to complete all requirements necessary for
license renewal without penalty.
6. A licensee whose license has been revoked, suspended,
or voluntarily surrendered must apply for and receive
reinstatement of the license, as provided by the board by rule,
prior to practicing a profession licensed under this chapter.
Sec. 35. Section 147.1, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026, are
amended to read as follows:
3. “Licensed” or “certified”, when applied to a physician
and surgeon, podiatric physician, osteopathic physician and
surgeon, genetic counselor, physician assistant, psychologist,
chiropractor, nurse, dentist, dental hygienist, dental
assistant, optometrist, speech pathologist, audiologist,
pharmacist, physical therapist, physical therapist assistant,
occupational therapist, occupational therapy assistant,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-12- ss/ko 12/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
orthotist, prosthetist, pedorthist, respiratory care
practitioner, practitioner of cosmetology arts and sciences,
practitioner of barbering, funeral director, dietitian,
behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst, marital and
family therapist, mental health counselor, midwife, respiratory
care and polysomnography practitioner, polysomnographic
technologist, social worker, massage therapist, athletic
trainer, acupuncturist, nursing home administrator, hearing aid
specialist, or sign language interpreter or transliterator,
accountant, architect, engineer or land surveyor, real estate
broker, real estate salesperson, real estate appraiser,
landscape architect, or interior designer means a person
licensed under this subtitle.
6. “Profession” means medicine and surgery, podiatry,
osteopathic medicine and surgery, genetic counseling, practice
as a physician assistant, psychology, chiropractic, nursing,
dentistry, dental hygiene, dental assisting, optometry, speech
pathology, audiology, pharmacy, physical therapy, physical
therapist assisting, occupational therapy, occupational therapy
assisting, respiratory care, cosmetology arts and sciences,
barbering, mortuary science, applied behavior analysis, marital
and family therapy, mental health counseling, midwifery,
polysomnography, social work, dietetics, massage therapy,
athletic training, acupuncture, nursing home administration,
practice as a hearing aid specialist, sign language
interpreting or transliterating, orthotics, prosthetics, or
pedorthics, accountancy, architecture, engineering and land
surveying, real estate, real estate brokerage, real estate
sale, real estate appraisal, landscape architecture, or
interior design.
Sec. 36. Section 147.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.2 License required.
1. A person shall not engage in the practice of medicine
and surgery, podiatry, osteopathic medicine and surgery,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-13- ss/ko 13/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
genetic counseling, psychology, chiropractic, physical
therapy, physical therapist assisting, nursing, dentistry,
dental hygiene, dental assisting, optometry, speech pathology,
audiology, occupational therapy, occupational therapy
assisting, orthotics, prosthetics, pedorthics, respiratory
care, pharmacy, cosmetology arts and sciences, barbering,
social work, dietetics, applied behavior analysis, marital
and family therapy or mental health counseling, massage
therapy, mortuary science, polysomnography, athletic training,
acupuncture, nursing home administration, or sign language
interpreting or transliterating, or shall not practice as a
physician assistant, or a hearing aid specialist, accountant,
architect, engineer or land surveyor, real estate broker, real
estate salesperson, real estate appraiser, landscape architect,
or interior designer unless the person, or entity employing the
person, if applicable, has obtained a license for that purpose
from the board for the profession or the department.
2. For purposes of this section, a person who is licensed
in another state and recognized for licensure in this state
pursuant to the nurse a licensure compact contained in section
152E.1 or pursuant to the advanced practice registered nurse
compact contained in section 152E.3 which issues a multistate
license or authorization to practice shall be considered to
have obtained a license to practice nursing the profession.
Sec. 37. Section 147.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.3 Qualifications.
An applicant for a license to practice a profession under
this subtitle is not ineligible because of age, citizenship,
sex, race, religion, marital status, or national origin,
although the application form may require citizenship
information.
Sec. 38. Section 147.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.5 Certificate of license.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-14- ss/ko 14/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. Every license to practice a profession shall be in
the form of a certificate under the seal of the board. Such
license shall be issued in the name of the board issued by the
department.
2. This section shall not apply to a person who is licensed
in another state and recognized for licensure in this state
pursuant to the nurse a licensure compact contained in section
152E.1 or pursuant to the advanced practice registered nurse
compact contained in section 152E.3 which issues a multistate
license or authorization to practice.
Sec. 39. Section 147.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. This section shall not apply to a person who is licensed
in another state and recognized for licensure in this state
pursuant to the nurse a licensure compact contained in section
152E.1 or pursuant to the advanced practice registered nurse
compact contained in section 152E.3 which issues a multistate
license or authorization to practice. A person licensed in
another state and recognized for licensure in this state
pursuant to either a compact shall, however, maintain a copy
of a license issued by the person’s home state available for
inspection when engaged in the practice of nursing the person’s
profession in this state.
Sec. 40. Section 147.8, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 41. Section 147.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.9 Change of address.
Every person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall notify
the board which issued the license department of a change in
the person’s address of record within a time period established
by board the department by rule.
Sec. 42. Section 147.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.10 Renewal.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-15- ss/ko 15/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
1. Every license to practice a profession shall expire
in multiyear intervals and be renewed upon application of
the licensee as determined by the board upon application
by the licensee department. Each board A renewal interval
for a license shall not exceed five years. The department
shall establish rules for license renewal and concomitant
fees. Application for renewal shall be made to the board
accompanied by the required fee at least thirty days prior to
the expiration of such license.
2. Each board The department may by rule establish a grace
period following expiration of a license in which the license
is not invalidated. Each board The department may assess a
reasonable penalty for renewal of a license during the grace
period. Failure of a licensee to renew a license within the
grace period shall cause the license to become inactive or
lapsed. A licensee whose license is inactive or lapsed shall
not engage in the practice of the profession until the license
is reactivated or reinstated.
Sec. 43. Section 147.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A licensee who allows the license to become inactive
or lapsed by failing to renew the license, as provided in
section 147.10, may reactivate the license upon payment of a
reactivation fee and compliance with other terms established by
board the department by rule.
Sec. 44. NEW SECTION. 147.11A Temporary license.
1. A board may issue a temporary license authorizing the
licensee to practice in a specific location or locations and
for a specified period of time if, in the opinion of the board,
the person possesses the qualifications prescribed by the board
for the license, which shall be substantially equivalent to
those required for licensure under this chapter. The board
shall determine by rule eligibility requirements for the
license and what type of examination shall be given, if any.
Requirements relating to regular permanent licensure are not
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-16- ss/ko 16/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
mandatory for a temporary license, except as specifically
determined by the board by rule. The granting of a temporary
license does not indicate that the person so licensed is
eligible for regular licensure.
2. A temporary license shall be issued for a period
determined by the department by rule but shall not exceed
one year. A temporary license may be renewed, but a person
shall not practice for more than three years under a temporary
license. The department shall set the fees for issuance and
renewal of a temporary license by rule.
3. Each board may adopt rules for the implementation of this
section, including for revocation of a temporary license.
Sec. 45. NEW SECTION. 147.11B Licensure by reciprocity.
A board may grant licensure, registration, or certification
by reciprocity. Each board that grants a license,
registration, or certification by reciprocity shall adopt rules
establishing the documentation that an applicant must furnish
in order to establish the applicant’s eligibility.
Sec. 46. NEW SECTION. 147.11C Voluntary surrender of
license.
The director of the department may accept the voluntary
surrender of a license if accompanied by a written statement of
intention. The voluntary surrender, when accepted, shall have
the same force and effect as an order of revocation.
Sec. 47. Section 147.13, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 21. For accountancy, the Iowa accountancy
examining board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 22. For architecture, the architectural
examining board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 23. For engineering and land surveying, the
engineering and land surveying examining board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 24. For real estate brokers and
salespersons, the real estate commission board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 25. For real estate appraisers, the real
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-17- ss/ko 17/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
estate appraiser examining board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 26. For landscape architecture, and the
landscape architectural examining board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 27. For registered interior design, the
interior design examining board.
Sec. 48. Section 147.14, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. t. For accountancy, a total of five members,
all of whom must be residents of this state. Four of the five
members must be holders of certificates granted under section
542.6 and one must not be a certified public accountant or
licensed public accountant and must represent the general
public. At least three of the holders of certificates issued
under section 542.6 must also be qualified to supervise attest
services as provided in section 542.7.
NEW PARAGRAPH. u. For architecture, a total of five
members, four of whom are licensed to practice architecture and
one of whom is not a licensed architect and who represents the
general public.
NEW PARAGRAPH. v. For engineering and land surveying,
three members who are licensed professional engineers, two
members who are licensed professional land surveyors, and
two members who are not licensed professional engineers or
licensed professional land surveyors and who shall represent
the general public. A licensed member must be actively engaged
in the practice of engineering or land surveying and been so
engaged for five consecutive years immediately preceding the
appointment, the last two years of which shall have been in
Iowa. Insofar as practicable, licensed engineer members of
the board shall be from different branches of the profession
of engineering.
NEW PARAGRAPH. w. For real estate brokers and salespersons,
four members who are licensed brokers or salespersons and one
member not licensed to practice real estate who shall represent
the general public. A member shall not hold any other elective
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-18- ss/ko 18/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
or appointive state or federal office. At least one licensed
member shall be a licensed real estate salesperson, except that
if the licensed real estate salesperson becomes a licensed real
estate broker during a term of office, that person may complete
the term, but is not eligible for reappointment as a licensed
real estate salesperson. A licensed member must be actively
engaged in real estate business.
NEW PARAGRAPH. x. For real estate appraisers, five members,
one of whom must be a public member and four of whom must be
certified real estate appraisers. A certified member must
be actively engaged in practice as a certified real estate
appraiser. Insofar as practicable, certified real estate
appraiser members should represent each class of certified
appraisers.
NEW PARAGRAPH. y. For landscape architecture, five members
who are professional landscape architects and two members
who are not professional landscape architects and who shall
represent the general public. Four of the five professional
members must be actively engaged in the practice of landscape
architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in
an accredited college or university, and must have been so
engaged for five years preceding appointment, the last two of
which shall have been in Iowa. One of the five professional
members must be actively engaged in the practice of landscape
architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in an
accredited college or university for a minimum of one year
immediately preceding appointment.
NEW PARAGRAPH. z. For interior design, a total of seven
members, five members who are registered interior designers and
who have been in the active practice of registered interior
design for not less than five years, the last two years of
which shall have been in Iowa, and two members who are not
registered interior designers and who shall represent the
general public.
Sec. 49. Section 147.14, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-19- ss/ko 19/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to read as follows:
2. A majority of the board members of a board who are
currently serving constitutes a quorum.
Sec. 50. Section 147.25, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. In addition to any other fee provided by law, a fee may
be set by the respective boards department for each license
and renewal of a license to practice a profession, which fee
shall be based on the annual cost of collecting information
for use by the board in the administration of the system of
health personnel statistics established by this section. The
fee shall be retained by the respective board in the manner in
which license and renewal fees are retained in section 147.82.
Sec. 51. Section 147.44, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.44 Reciprocal agreements.
A board may enter into a reciprocal agreement with a
licensing authority of another state for the purpose of
recognizing licenses issued by the other state, provided
that such licensing authority imposes licensure requirements
substantially equivalent to those imposed in this state. The
board may establish by rule the conditions for the recognition
of such licenses and the department may establish by rule the
process for licensing such individuals to practice in this
state.
Sec. 52. NEW SECTION. 147.57 Voluntary agreements.
A board, after due notice and hearing, may issue an order to
revoke, suspend, or restrict a license to practice a licensed
profession, or to issue a restricted license on application if
the board determines that a licensee or applicant has entered
into a voluntary agreement to restrict the practice of the
licensed profession in another state, district, territory,
country, or agency of the federal government. A certified copy
of the voluntary agreement shall be considered prima facie
evidence.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-20- ss/ko 20/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 53. Section 147.73, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. As prohibiting any holder of a degree conferred by an
institution of learning accredited by the appropriate board
created in this chapter, or by some a recognized state or
national accrediting agency, from using the title which such
degree authorizes the holder to use, but the holder shall not
use such degree or abbreviation in any manner which might
mislead the public as to the holder’s qualifications to treat
human ailments.
Sec. 54. Section 147.74, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 29. For the profession of accountancy,
a person or firm licensed under chapter 542 may use the
designations described in section 542.13.
NEW SUBSECTION. 30. An architect licensed under chapter
544A may use the words “architect”, “licensed architect”, or
“architectural designer” after the person’s name.
NEW SUBSECTION. 31. A person licensed to engage in the
practice of engineering under chapter 542B may use the words
“professional engineer” or “licensed engineer” after the
person’s name. A person licensed to engage in the practice
of land surveying under chapter 542B may use the words
“professional land surveyor” or “licensed land surveyor” after
the person’s name.
NEW SUBSECTION. 32. A real estate broker licensed under
chapter 543B may use the words “real estate broker” after
the person’s name. A real estate salesperson licensed under
chapter 543B may use the words “real estate salesperson” after
the person’s name.
NEW SUBSECTION. 33. A person holding a certificate to
engage in the practice of real estate appraisals under chapter
543D may use the words “certified real estate appraiser” after
the person’s name. A person holding a registration to engage
in the practice of real estate appraisals as an associate
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-21- ss/ko 21/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
under chapter 543D may use the words “associate real estate
appraiser” after the person’s name.
NEW SUBSECTION. 34. A person licensed to engage in the
practice of landscape architecture under chapter 544B may
use the words “landscape architect”, “professional landscape
architect”, or “landscape architecture designer” after the
person’s name.
NEW SUBSECTION. 35. A person who has been issued a
certificate of registration under chapter 544C may use the
words “registered interior designer” or any other title or
device indicating that the person is a registered interior
designer after the person’s name.
Sec. 55. Section 147.76, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.76 Rules.
The boards for the various professions shall adopt all
necessary and proper rules to administer and interpret this
chapter and chapters 148 through 157, except chapter 148D,
chapter 272C, and chapters 542 through 544C.
Sec. 56. Section 147.80, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
Each board, following approval by the The department, may,
or at the direction of the department, shall, by rule establish
or revise fees for the following:
Sec. 57. Section 147.80, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The department shall annually prepare estimates of
projected revenues to be generated by all fees collected
as well as a projection of the aggregate administrative
costs and rental expenses attributable to all boards and the
division of the department responsible for licensing related
to such boards. The department shall annually review and, if
necessary, direct the boards to adjust the schedule of fees to
cover aggregate projected expenses and ensure fees imposed in
this state are not greater than similar fees imposed by similar
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-22- ss/ko 22/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
boards or agencies in other states. The department shall
annually provide to each appropriate board a comparison of the
amount of the board’s fees as compared to similar fees imposed
by similar boards or agencies in other states.
Sec. 58. Section 147.82, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.82 Disposition of fees.
All fees collected by a board listed in section 147.13 or by
the department, and fees collected pursuant to sections 124.301
and 147.80 and chapter 155A by the board of pharmacy, shall
be deposited in the licensing and regulation fund created in
section 10A.507.
Sec. 59. Section 147.86, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.86 Penalties.
1. Any person violating any provision of this subtitle,
except insofar as the provisions apply or relate to or affect
the practice of pharmacy, or where a specific penalty is
otherwise provided, shall be guilty of a serious misdemeanor.
2. When it appears to a board that a person has violated a
provision of this subtitle, the board may certify the facts to
the attorney general or the county attorney of the county where
the person maintains a business office.
3. If, after an investigation, a board has reason to believe
that a person has knowingly engaged in an act or practice that
constitutes a violation of this subtitle, the board may submit
the information to the attorney general of any state, or other
appropriate law enforcement official, who, in such official’s
discretion, may initiate an appropriate criminal proceeding.
4. Evidence of the commission of a single act prohibited
by this subtitle, chapters 148 through 157, chapter 272C, or
chapters 542 through 544C is sufficient to justify a penalty,
injunction, restraining order, or conviction, without evidence
of a general course of conduct.
Sec. 60. Section 147.87, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-23- ss/ko 23/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
to read as follows:
2. The department may administratively close a complaint
that does not allege a violation of this chapter, the board’s
enabling statute, or a rule of the board, if the complaint
does not allege harm to the public, or if the complaint is
referred to another agency or law enforcement. The board may
administratively terminate an investigation if the alleged
violation of this chapter, the board’s enabling statute, or
rule of the board is not substantiated or does not merit
discipline.
Sec. 61. Section 147.88, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
147.88 Inspections and investigations.
1. The department may perform inspections and
investigations as required by this subtitle.
2. The department shall employ personnel pursuant to
chapter 8A, subchapter IV, to perform duties related to
inspection and investigation functions under this subtitle.
The costs and expenses of inspectors and investigators shall be
paid from funds appropriated to the department.
3. The department may employ clerical assistants pursuant
to chapter 8A, subchapter IV, to administer and enforce this
subtitle. The costs and expenses of clerical assistants shall
be paid from funds appropriated to the department.
4. Investigators authorized by a board or the department
shall have the powers and status of peace officers when
enforcing this subtitle, chapters 148 through 157 except 148D,
chapter 272C, and chapters 542 through 544C.
5. If an investigation pursuant to this subtitle, chapters
148 through 157 except 148D, chapter 272C, or chapters 542
through 544C, reveals that an unlicensed person has acted in
the capacity of a licensed person or entity, the board or
department shall issue a cease and desist order, and may impose
a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars.
Sec. 62. Section 147.92, Code 2026, is amended to read as
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-24- ss/ko 24/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
follows:
147.92 Attorney general.
Upon request of a board, the attorney general shall
institute in the name of the state the proper proceedings
against any person charged by the board with violating any
provision of this or the following chapters of this subtitle,
chapters 147 through 157, chapter 272C, or chapters 542 through
544C.
Sec. 63. Section 148.3, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are
amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 64. Section 148.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
148.5 Resident physician license.
A physician, who is a graduate of a medical school or
college of osteopathic medicine and surgery and is serving as a
resident physician who is not otherwise licensed to practice
medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery in
this state, shall be required to obtain from the board a
license to practice as a resident physician. The license shall
be designated “Resident Physician License” and shall authorize
the licensee to serve as a resident physician only, under
the supervision of a licensed practitioner of medicine and
surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, in an institution
approved for such training by the board. A license shall be
valid for a duration as determined by the board department by
rule. The fee for each license shall be set by the board to
cover the administrative costs of issuing the license. The
board shall determine in each instance those eligible for a
license, whether or not examinations shall be given, and the
type of examinations. Requirements of the law pertaining
to regular permanent licensure shall not be mandatory for a
resident physician license except as specifically designated by
the board. The granting of a resident physician license does
not in any way indicate that the person licensed is necessarily
eligible for regular permanent licensure, or that the board in
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-25- ss/ko 25/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
any way is obligated to license the individual.
Sec. 65. Section 148.11, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. The board shall establish a fee for initial issuance and
renewal of a special license. The board shall establish rules
for granting and renewing a special license consistent with
those for permanent licenses.
Sec. 66. Section 148.11A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. An application for an administrative medicine license
shall be made to the board. An applicant for an administrative
medicine license shall meet all of the requirements established
in section 148.3 and any additional requirements established by
the board by rule. The board shall also adopt rules governing
the initial issuance and renewal of administrative medicine
licenses and establishing fees therefor. All license and
renewal fees shall be paid to the board.
Sec. 67. Section 148B.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 1A. “Department” means the department of
inspections, appeals, and licensing.
Sec. 68. Section 148B.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
148B.4 Limited permit.
1. A limited permit to practice occupational therapy may
be granted to a person who has completed the academic and
field work requirements for occupational therapists under
this chapter and has not yet taken or received the results of
the entry-level certification examination. A permit granted
pursuant to this subsection shall be valid for a period of
time as determined by the board department by rule and shall
allow the person to practice occupational therapy under the
direction and appropriate supervision of an occupational
therapist licensed under this chapter. The permit shall expire
when the person is issued a license under section 148B.5 or
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-26- ss/ko 26/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
if the person is notified that the person did not pass the
examination. The limited permit shall not be renewed.
2. A limited permit to assist in the practice of
occupational therapy may be granted to a person who has
completed the academic and field work requirements for
occupational therapy assistants under this chapter and has
not yet taken or received the results of the entry-level
certification examination. A permit granted pursuant to this
subsection shall be valid for a period of time as determined
by the board department by rule and shall allow the person
to assist in the practice of occupational therapy under the
direction and appropriate supervision of an occupational
therapist licensed under this chapter. The permit shall expire
when the person is issued a license under section 148B.5 or
if the person is notified that the person did not pass the
examination. The limited permit shall not be renewed.
Sec. 69. Section 148B.5, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026,
is amended to read as follows:
An applicant applying for a license as an occupational
therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant must file a
written an application on forms provided in a manner prescribed
by the board, showing to the satisfaction of the board that the
applicant meets the following requirements:
Sec. 70. Section 148B.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
148B.7 Board of physical and occupational therapy —— powers
and duties.
The board shall adopt rules relating to professional conduct
to carry out the policy of this chapter, chapter 147, and
chapter 272C, including but not limited to rules relating to
professional licensing and to the establishment of ethical
standards of practice for persons holding a license to practice
occupational therapy in this state.
Sec. 71. Section 148C.3, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-27- ss/ko 27/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
The board shall adopt rules to govern the licensure of
physician assistants. An applicant for licensure shall submit
the fee prescribed by the board department and shall meet the
requirements established by the board with respect to each of
the following:
Sec. 72. Section 148C.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 73. Section 148E.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
148E.7 Duties of board.
The board shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter,
and chapter 147, and chapter 272C which are necessary for the
performance of its the board’s duties.
Sec. 74. Section 148F.3, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 75. Section 148G.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 1A. “Department” means the department of
inspections, appeals, and licensing.
Sec. 76. Section 148G.6, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
Beginning January 1, 2017, a person seeking licensure as
a respiratory care and polysomnography practitioner or as a
polysomnographic technologist shall apply to the board and pay
the fees established by the board department for the type of
license for which the applicant is applying. Beginning with
the March 31, 2016, license renewal period, a person licensed
as a respiratory care practitioner who seeks a respiratory
care and polysomnography practitioner license shall make
such application with the application for license renewal
and pay the fees established by the board department. The
fees established by the board for a respiratory care and
polysomnography practitioner license shall not exceed one
hundred twenty percent of the cost of a respiratory care
practitioner license issued pursuant to chapter 152B or a
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-28- ss/ko 28/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
polysomnographic technologist license issued pursuant to
this section. The application for a respiratory care and
polysomnography practitioner license must meet the requirements
of this section. Upon receipt of an application, the board
shall conduct a background check of the applicant. An
application for either type of licensure shall show that the
applicant is of good moral character and is at least eighteen
years of age, and shall include proof that the person has
satisfied one of the following educational requirements:
Sec. 77. Section 148G.6, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 78. Section 148I.2, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
e. Submit an application fee as prescribed by the board by
rule provided in section 147.80.
Sec. 79. Section 148I.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
The board shall adopt rules consistent with this chapter,
and chapter 147, and chapter 272C which are necessary for the
performance of the board’s duties. The rules shall do all of
the following:
Sec. 80. Section 148I.4, subsection 1, paragraph m, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
m. Establish Require an annual license fee as provided in
section 147.80.
Sec. 81. Section 152.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A license possessed by an applicant from a state
which has not adopted the nurse licensure compact contained
in section 152E.1 or the advanced practice registered nurse
compact contained in section 152E.3 shall be recognized by
the board under conditions specified which indicate that the
licensee meets all the qualifications required under section
152.7. If a foreign license is recognized, the board may issue
a reciprocal license by endorsement without an examination
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-29- ss/ko 29/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
being required. Recognition shall be based on whether the
foreign licensee is qualified to practice nursing. The board
may issue a temporary license to a natural person an individual
who has completed the requirements of and applied for licensure
by endorsement a reciprocal license. The board shall determine
the length of time a temporary license shall remain effective.
Sec. 82. Section 152B.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The establishment of a system for the licensure of
respiratory care practitioners and the establishment and
collection of licensure fees.
Sec. 83. Section 152B.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
152B.12 Suspension and revocation of licenses.
The board may suspend, or revoke or impose probationary
conditions upon a license issued pursuant to rules adopted in
accordance with section 152B.6, or decline to renew a license,
for a violation of a provision of this chapter, section 147.55,
section 272C.10, or rules adopted by the board.
Sec. 84. Section 152C.3, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
c. Payment of a reasonable fee required by the board which
shall compensate and be retained by the board for the costs of
administering this chapter pursuant to section 147.80.
Sec. 85. Section 152C.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
152C.7 Suspension and revocation of licenses.
The board may suspend, or revoke, or impose probationary
conditions upon a license issued pursuant to rules adopted in
accordance with section 152C.3 decline to renew, a license for
a violation of a provision of this chapter, section 147.55,
section 272C.10, or rules adopted by the board.
Sec. 86. Section 152D.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. Application and renewal procedures, fees, Applications
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-30- ss/ko 30/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and reciprocal agreements shall be provided submitted in
accordance with rules adopted by the board pursuant to chapter
17A.
Sec. 87. Section 152D.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. Adopt rules consistent with this chapter, and chapter
147, and chapter 272C which are necessary for the performance
of its the board’s duties.
Sec. 88. Section 152D.5, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended
by striking the subsection.
Sec. 89. Section 153.12, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
153.12 Board and department defined.
As used in this chapter, “board”:
1. “Board” means the dental board created under chapter 147.
2. “Department” means the department of inspections,
appeals, and licensing.
Sec. 90. Section 153.22, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
153.22 Resident license.
A dentist or dental hygienist who is serving only as a
resident, intern, or graduate student and who is not licensed
to practice in this state is required to obtain from the board
a temporary or special license to practice as a resident,
intern, or graduate student. The license shall be designated
“Resident License” and shall authorize the licensee to serve
as a resident, intern, or graduate student only, under the
supervision of a licensed practitioner, in an institution
approved for this purpose by the board. Such license shall
be renewed at the discretion of the board. The fee for a
resident license and the renewal fee shall be set by the board
based upon the cost of issuance of the license. The board
shall determine in each instance those eligible for a resident
license, whether or not examinations shall be given, and the
type of examination. None of the requirements for regular
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-31- ss/ko 31/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
permanent licensure are mandatory for resident licensure except
as specifically designated by the board. The issuance of a
resident license shall not in any way indicate that the person
so licensed is necessarily eligible for regular licensure or
that the board is obligated to so license the person. The
board may revoke a resident license at any time it shall
determine either that the caliber of work done by a licensee
or the type of supervision being given such licensee does not
conform to reasonable standards established by the board.
Sec. 91. Section 153.33, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 92. Section 153.33, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
e. To promulgate adopt rules as may be necessary to
implement the provisions of this chapter, chapter 147, and
chapter 272C.
Sec. 93. Section 153.33, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are
amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 94. Section 153.37, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
153.37 Dental college and dental hygiene program faculty
permits.
The board may issue a faculty permit entitling the holder
to practice dentistry or dental hygiene within a college of
dentistry or a dental hygiene program and affiliated teaching
facilities as an adjunct to the faculty member’s teaching
position, associated responsibilities, and functions. The dean
of the college of dentistry or chairperson of a dental hygiene
program shall certify to the board those bona fide members of
the college’s or a dental hygiene program’s faculty who are not
licensed and registered to practice dentistry or dental hygiene
in Iowa. Any faculty member so certified shall, prior to
commencing the member’s duties in the college of dentistry or a
dental hygiene program, make written application to the board
for a permit. The permit shall be for a period determined by
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-32- ss/ko 32/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the board and may be renewed at the discretion of the board.
The fee for the faculty permit and the renewal shall be set by
the board based upon the administrative cost of issuance of
the permit. The fee shall be deposited in the same manner as
fees provided for in section 147.82. The faculty permit shall
be valid during the time the holder remains a member of the
faculty and shall subject the holder to all provisions of this
chapter.
Sec. 95. Section 154A.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
154A.13 Temporary permit.
A person who has not been licensed as a hearing aid
specialist may obtain a temporary permit from the department
upon completion of the application accompanied by the written
verification of employment from a licensed hearing aid
specialist. The department shall issue a temporary permit
for two years which that shall not be renewed or reissued for
more than a total of two years. The fee for issuance of the
temporary permit shall be set by the department in accordance
with the provisions for establishment of fees by boards in
section 147.80. The temporary permit entitles an applicant to
engage in the fitting or selection and sale of hearing aids
under the supervision of a person holding a valid license or an
audiologist licensed pursuant to chapter 154F.
Sec. 96. Section 154B.6, subsections 3 and 4, Code 2026, are
amended to read as follows:
3. A person who possesses a doctoral degree in psychology
from an institution approved by the board but who has not
completed the other requirements for licensure under this
section may apply for a provisional license. The license shall
be designated as a “provisional license in psychology”. The
provisional license shall authorize the licensee to practice
psychology under the supervision of a supervisor who meets the
qualifications determined by the board by rule. A provisional
license shall be valid for a period of two years. The fee for
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-33- ss/ko 33/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a provisional license shall be set by the board to cover the
administrative costs of issuance. The board shall also set a
fee for renewal of a provisional license.
4. A person who is enrolled in a doctoral degree program in
psychology at an institution approved by the board but who has
not completed the other requirements for licensure under this
section may apply for a provisional license during the person’s
internship program. The license shall be designated as a
“provisional license in psychology”. The provisional license
shall authorize the licensee to practice psychology under
the supervision of a supervisor who meets the qualifications
determined by the board by rule. A provisional license shall
be valid for a period of two years. The fee for a provisional
license shall be set by the board to cover the administrative
costs of issuance. The board shall also set a fee for renewal
of a provisional license.
Sec. 97. Section 154B.13, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. Procedures to obtain a conditional prescription
certificate, a prescription certificate, and a renewal of
a prescription certificate. The board may set reasonable
application and renewal fees.
Sec. 98. Section 154C.3, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
3. License renewal and continuing education. Licenses
The terms of each license shall be renewed biennially, and
licensees determined by the department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing by rule. Licensees shall pay a fee for renewal
as determined by the board department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing and shall present evidence satisfactory to the
board that the licensee has satisfied continuing education
requirements as determined by the board. The board shall
not limit the number of continuing education credits that
may be obtained online in satisfying continuing education
requirements, provided that any online program providing
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-34- ss/ko 34/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
continuing education credits online shall comply with standards
set by the board.
Sec. 99. Section 154D.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
154D.7 Temporary license —— marital and family therapy ——
mental health counseling —— fees.
Any person who has fulfilled all of the requirements for
licensure under section 154D.2, except for having completed
the postgraduate supervised clinical experience requirement as
determined by the board by rule, may apply to the board for a
temporary license. The license shall be designated “temporary
license in marital and family therapy” or “temporary license in
mental health counseling” and shall authorize the licensee to
practice marital and family therapy or mental health counseling
under the supervision of a qualified supervisor as determined
by the board by rule. The license shall be valid for three
years and may be renewed at the discretion of the board. The
fee for a temporary license shall be set by the board to
cover the administrative costs of issuing the license, and if
renewed, a renewal fee as set by the board shall be required.
Sec. 100. Section 154D.8, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
An applicant who has been a licensed marital and family
therapist or licensed mental health counselor under the laws
of another jurisdiction may file an application with the board
for licensure by endorsement reciprocity. The board shall
adopt rules requiring an applicant for licensure by endorsement
reciprocity to do all of the following:
Sec. 101. Section 154E.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Adopt rules consistent with this chapter, and with
chapter 147, and chapter 272C which are necessary for the
performance of its the board’s duties.
Sec. 102. Section 154E.3A, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-35- ss/ko 35/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
154E.3A Temporary license.
An individual who does not meet the requirements for
licensure by examination pursuant to section 154E.3 may apply
for or renew a temporary license. The temporary license
shall authorize the licensee to practice as a sign language
interpreter or transliterator under the direct supervision
of a sign language interpreter or transliterator licensed
pursuant to section 154E.3. The temporary license shall be
valid for two years one year and may only be renewed one time
in accordance with standards established by rule be renewed at
the discretion of the board. An individual shall not practice
for more than a total of four years under a temporary license.
The board may revoke a temporary license if it determines that
the temporary licensee has violated standards established by
rule. The board may adopt requirements for temporary licensure
to implement this section.
Sec. 103. Section 154E.3B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A,
and consistent with chapters 147 and 272C, for the process of
applying for, granting, suspending, reinstating, renewing, and
revoking a license issued pursuant to this section.
Sec. 104. Section 154F.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
154F.5 Temporary clinical license —— fee.
Any person who has fulfilled all of the requirements for
licensure under this chapter, except for having completed the
nine months’ clinical experience requirement as provided in
section 154F.3, subsection 1 or 2, may apply to the board for a
temporary clinical license. The license shall be designated
“temporary clinical license in speech pathology” or “temporary
clinical license in audiology” and shall authorize the licensee
to practice speech pathology or audiology under the supervision
of a licensed speech pathologist or licensed audiologist, as
appropriate. The license shall be valid for one year and
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-36- ss/ko 36/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
may be renewed at the discretion of the board. The fee for
a temporary clinical license shall be set by the board to
cover the administrative costs of issuing the license, and if
renewed, a renewal fee as set by the board shall be required. A
temporary clinical license shall be issued only upon evidence
satisfactory to the board that the applicant will be supervised
by a person licensed as a speech pathologist or audiologist,
as appropriate.
Sec. 105. Section 154F.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
154F.6 Temporary permit.
The board may, at its discretion, issue a temporary permit
to a nonresident authorizing the permittee to practice
speech pathology or audiology in this state for a period
not to exceed three months whenever, in the opinion of the
board, a need exists and the permittee, in the opinion of the
board, possesses the necessary qualifications which shall be
substantially equivalent to those required for licensure by
this chapter.
Sec. 106. Section 155.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
155.4 Licensing function.
The board shall license nursing home administrators in
accordance with this chapter, chapter 147, chapter 272C, and
rules issued by the board. A nursing home administrator’s
license shall not be transferable and, if not inactive,
shall be valid until revoked pursuant to section 147.55 or
voluntarily surrendered.
Sec. 107. Section 155.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
155.5 License fees.
Each person licensed as a nursing home administrator shall
be required to must pay a license fee in an amount to be fixed
by the board department of inspections, appeals, and licensing.
The license shall expire in multiyear intervals determined by
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-37- ss/ko 37/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the board department of inspections, appeals, and licensing and
be renewable upon payment of a renewal fee. A person who fails
to renew a license by the expiration date shall be allowed to
do so within thirty days following its expiration, but the
board may assess a reasonable penalty.
Sec. 108. Section 155A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 10A. “Department” means the department of
inspections, appeals, and licensing.
Sec. 109. Section 155A.7, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026,
are amended to read as follows:
1. Registration programs for pharmacist-interns, pharmacy
technicians, and pharmacy support persons are established for
the purposes of identification, tracking, and disciplinary
action for the violation of federal drug laws or regulations,
state drug or pharmacy laws, or rules of the board and
department.
2. A person who is or desires to be a pharmacist-intern,
pharmacy technician, or pharmacy support person in this state
shall apply to the board for registration on a form prescribed
by the board department.
a. A pharmacist-intern shall be registered during internship
training and thereafter pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
b. An applicant for a new pharmacy technician registration
or for a pharmacy technician renewal shall provide proof of
current certification by a national technician certification
authority approved by the board. A person who is in the
process of acquiring national certification as a pharmacy
technician and who is in training to become a pharmacy
technician shall register with the board as a pharmacy
technician.
Sec. 110. Section 155A.7, subsection 3, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A on
matters pertaining to pharmacist-intern, pharmacy technician,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-38- ss/ko 38/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and pharmacy support person registration, renewals, fees,
training, national certification for pharmacy technicians,
approval of preceptors for pharmacist-interns, and other
relevant matters. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 17A related to registration, renewal, and fees.
Sec. 111. Section 155A.8, subsection 4, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
4. The board department shall specify by rule procedures
and fees to renew a pharmacist license and penalties for late
renewal or failure to renew a pharmacist license.
Sec. 112. Section 155A.13, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. The board department shall specify by rule the licensing
procedures to be followed, including specifications of forms
for use in applying for a pharmacy license and fees for filing
an application.
Sec. 113. Section 155A.13, subsection 6, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
To qualify for a pharmacy license, the applicant shall
submit to the board a license fee as determined by the board
department and a completed application on a form prescribed
by the board department. The application shall include the
following and such other information as required by rules of
adopted by the board department and shall be given under oath:
Sec. 114. Section 155A.13A, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
A pharmacy located outside of this state that delivers,
dispenses, or distributes by any method, prescription drugs
or devices to an ultimate user in this state shall obtain
a nonresident pharmacy license from the board. The board
department shall make available an application form for a
nonresident pharmacy license and shall require such information
it deems necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section. A
nonresident pharmacy shall do all of the following in order to
obtain a nonresident pharmacy license from the board:
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-39- ss/ko 39/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 115. Section 155A.13A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. Submit a completed application form and an application
fee as determined by the board department.
Sec. 116. Section 155A.13C, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
Any compounding facility that is registered as an
outsourcing facility, as defined in 21 U.S.C. §353b, that
distributes sterile compounded human drug products without
a patient-specific prescription to an authorized agent or
practitioner in this state shall obtain an outsourcing facility
license from the board prior to engaging in such distribution.
If an outsourcing facility dispenses prescription drugs
pursuant to patient-specific prescriptions to patients in Iowa,
the outsourcing facility shall obtain and maintain a valid Iowa
pharmacy license or Iowa nonresident pharmacy license under
this chapter. The board department shall make available an
application form for an outsourcing facility license and shall
require such information it deems necessary to fulfill the
purposes of this section. An outsourcing facility shall do all
of the following in order to obtain an outsourcing facility
license from the board:
Sec. 117. Section 155A.13C, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. Submit a completed application form and application fee
as determined by the board department.
Sec. 118. Section 155A.13C, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 119. Section 155A.14, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
155A.14 Renewal of pharmacy license.
The board department shall specify by rule the procedures to
be followed and the fee to be paid for a renewal certificate,
and the penalties for late renewal or failure to renew a
pharmacy license.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-40- ss/ko 40/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 120. Section 155A.17, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. The board shall adopt rules establishing requirements
for wholesale distributor licenses, licensure fees, and other
relevant matters consistent with the federal Drug Supply Chain
Security Act, 21 U.S.C. §360eee et seq. Licensure fees shall
be established by the department by rule.
Sec. 121. Section 155A.17A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. The board shall adopt rules establishing requirements
for a third-party logistics provider license, licensure fees,
and other relevant matters consistent with the federal Drug
Supply Chain Security Act, 21 U.S.C. §360eee et seq. Licensure
fees shall be established by the department by rule.
Sec. 122. Section 155A.43, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
155A.43 Pharmaceutical collection and disposal program ——
annual allocation.
Of the fees collected by the board department pursuant to
sections 124.301 and 147.80 and this chapter, and retained by
the board department pursuant to section 147.82, the board
department may annually allocate a sum deemed by the board
department to be adequate for administering the pharmaceutical
collection and disposal program. The program shall provide
for the management and disposal of unused, excess, and expired
pharmaceuticals, including the management and disposal
of controlled substances pursuant to state and federal
regulations. The board department may contract with one or
more vendors for the provision of supplies and services to
manage and maintain the program and to safely and appropriately
dispose of pharmaceuticals collected through the program.
Sec. 123. Section 156.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
156.8 Internships.
The board shall, by rule, provide for internships in
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-41- ss/ko 41/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
mortuary science, and shall regulate the registration, and
training, and fee for internships.
Sec. 124. Section 156.14, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. The board shall specify by rule the licensing procedures
to be followed, including specifications of forms for use in
applying for an establishment license and fees for filing an
application. The board shall specify by rule minimum standards
for professional responsibility in the conduct of a funeral
establishment or a cremation establishment.
Sec. 125. Section 156.14, subsection 3, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
To qualify for a funeral establishment or a cremation
establishment license, the applicant shall submit to the board
a license fee as determined by the board and a completed
application on a form prescribed by the board that shall
include the following information and be given under oath:
Sec. 126. Section 156.15, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended by adding the following new paragraphs:
NEW PARAGRAPH. e. Failed to keep and maintain records
required by this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter.
NEW PARAGRAPH. f. Violated section 147.55 or 272C.10.
Sec. 127. Section 156.15, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 128. Section 157.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The fee for a temporary permit shall be established by
the board department as provided in section 147.80.
Sec. 129. Section 157.4, subsection 3, paragraph e, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
e. An applicant shall submit an application fee determined
by the board department by rule.
Sec. 130. Section 157.4B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 131. Section 157.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-42- ss/ko 42/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. The application for a license for a school shall be
accompanied by the annual license fee determined pursuant to
section 147.80, and shall state the name and location of the
school and such other additional information as the board may
require. The license is valid for one year a period determined
by the department by rule and may be renewed.
Sec. 132. Section 157.8, subsection 3, paragraph c, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
c. A person employed as an instructor in the barbering
and cosmetology arts and sciences by a licensed school shall
be licensed in the practice and shall possess a separate
instructor’s license which shall be renewed biennially on
a schedule as determined by the department by rule. An
instructor shall file an application with the department on
forms prescribed by the board. Requirements for licensure as
an instructor shall be determined by the board by rule.
Sec. 133. Section 157.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
157.9 License suspension and revocation.
Any license issued by the department under the provisions
of this chapter may be suspended, revoked, or renewal denied
by the board for violation of any provision of this chapter,
chapter 147, chapter 272C, or rules promulgated by the board
under the provisions of chapter 17A.
Sec. 134. Section 157.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. The application shall be accompanied by the biennial
license fee determined pursuant to section 147.80. The license
is valid for two years a term determined by the department by
rule and may be renewed.
Sec. 135. Section 272C.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. Revoke a license, or suspend a license either until
further order of the board or for a specified period, upon any
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-43- ss/ko 43/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
of the grounds specified in section 100D.5, 105.22, 147.55,
148.6, 148B.7, 152.10, 153.34, 154A.24, 169.13, 455B.219,
542.10, 542B.21, 543B.29, 544A.13, 544B.15, or 602.3203 or
chapter 151 or 155, as applicable, or upon any other grounds
specifically provided for in this chapter for revocation of
the license of a licensee subject to the jurisdiction of
that board, or upon failure of the licensee to comply with a
decision of the board imposing licensee discipline.
Sec. 136. Section 272C.4, subsection 6, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
6. Define by rule acts or omissions that are grounds for
revocation or suspension of a license under section 100D.5,
105.22, 147.55, 148.6, 148B.7, 152.10, 153.34, 154A.24, 169.13,
455B.219, 542.10, 542B.21, 543B.29, 544A.13, 544B.15, or
602.3203 or chapter 148I, 151, or 155, as applicable, and to
define by rule acts or omissions that constitute negligence,
careless acts, or omissions within the meaning of section
272C.3, subsection 2, paragraph “b”, which licensees are
required to report to the board pursuant to section 272C.9,
subsection 2.
Sec. 137. Section 272C.5, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
c. Shall state whether the procedures are an alternative
to or an addition to the procedures stated in sections 100D.5,
105.23, 105.24, 148.6 through 148.9, 152.10, 152.11, 153.33,
and 154A.23, 542.11, 542B.22, 543B.35, 543B.36, and 544B.16.
Sec. 138. Section 459.102, subsection 44, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
44. “Professional engineer” means a person engaged in the
practice of engineering as defined in section 542B.2 who is
has been issued a certificate of licensure as a professional
engineer pursuant to section 542B.17.
Sec. 139. Section 538A.2, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
e. A person licensed as a real estate broker or salesperson,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-44- ss/ko 44/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
under section 543B.20 chapter 543B, acting within the course
and scope of that license.
Sec. 140. Section 542.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
NEW SUBSECTION. 1A. “Attest and compilation review record”
means a file, report, or other information relating to the
professional competence of an applicant in the possession of an
attest and compilation review team, or information concerning
an attest and compilation services review developed by a review
team in the possession of an applicant.
NEW SUBSECTION. 1B. “Attest and compilation review report”
means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of a
certified public accounting firm’s compliance with applicable
accounting, auditing, and other attestation standards adopted
by generally recognized standard-setting bodies.
NEW SUBSECTION. 1C. “Attest and compilation review team”
means a person or organization participating in an attest and
compilation review function, but does not include the board.
NEW SUBSECTION. 1D. “Attest and compilation services
review” means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more
aspects of the professional work of a licensee or firm that
performs attest or compilation services, by a licensed person
or persons who are not affiliated with the licensee or firm
being reviewed. “Attest and compilation services review” does
not include a peer review conducted pursuant to chapter 272C in
connection with a disciplinary investigation.
Sec. 141. Section 542.3, subsections 19, 20, 21, and 22,
Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 142. Section 542.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph
1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
An Iowa accountancy examining board is created within the
department of inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to
section 147.13 to administer and enforce this chapter.
Sec. 143. Section 542.4, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b,
c, d, e, f, and g, Code 2026, are amended by striking the
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-45- ss/ko 45/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
paragraphs.
Sec. 144. Section 542.4, subsections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 8,
Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 145. Section 542.4, subsection 9, paragraph b, Code
2026, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 146. Section 542.4, subsection 9, paragraphs q and t,
Code 2026, are amended to read as follows:
q. Rules regarding peer attest and compilation services
review that may be required to be performed under this chapter.
t. Such other rules as the board deems necessary or
appropriate for administering this chapter, including but not
limited to rules establishing fees and rules of professional
conduct, pertaining to corporations or limited liability
companies practicing accounting, which the board deems
consistent with or required by the public welfare. The
board may adopt rules governing the style, name, and title of
corporations and limited liability companies and governing the
affiliation of corporations and limited liability companies
with other organizations.
Sec. 147. Section 542.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended
to read as follows:
1. A certificate as a certified public accountant may
be granted to a person of good moral character who makes
application pursuant to section 542.6 and who satisfies the
education, experience, and examination requirements of this
section and rules adopted pursuant to this section.
Sec. 148. Section 542.5, subsections 6, 10, and 11, Code
2026, are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 149. Section 542.6, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
542.6 Issuance and renewal of certificates —— maintenance of
competency.
1. a. The board shall issue a certificate to a person who
makes application on a form prescribed and furnished by the
board and who demonstrates either of the following:
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-46- ss/ko 46/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
(1) That the person’s qualifications, including where
applicable the qualifications prescribed by section 542.5,
satisfy the requirements of this section, or that the person
holds a certificate issued under prior law.
(2) That the person holds in good standing a certificate or
license to practice as a certified public accountant in another
state or equivalent designation from a foreign country, and is
eligible under the substantial equivalency or other provisions
of section 542.19.
b. The holder of a certificate issued under this section
by the board shall only provide attest services in a certified
public accounting firm that is issued a permit under section
542.7, or through a certified public accounting firm with a
practice privilege under section 542.20.
2. A certificate shall be initially issued, and renewed,
for a period of not more than three years, but in any event
shall expire on a date specified by rule. A person who fails
to renew a certificate as a certified public accountant by the
expiration date shall be allowed to do so within thirty days
following its expiration, but the board may assess a reasonable
penalty. The board shall specify by rule the conditions under
which a lapsed certificate may be reinstated, including the
imposition of administrative penalties.
3. A certificate holder, for renewal of a certificate
under this section, shall participate in a program of learning
designed to maintain professional competency. Such program
of learning must comply with rules adopted by the board. The
board, by rule, may grant an exception to this requirement
for a certificate holder who does not perform or offer to
perform for the public one or more kinds of services involving
the use of accounting or auditing skills, including issuance
of reports on financial statements or the use of one or more
kinds of management advisory, financial advisory, or consulting
services, or the preparation of tax returns or the furnishing
of advice on tax matters. A certificate holder entitled to an
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-47- ss/ko 47/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
exception by rule of the board shall place the word “inactive”
adjacent to the holder’s certified public accountant title on
any business card, letterhead, or other document or device,
with the exception of the certificate holder’s certified public
accountant certificate, on which the certificate holder’s
certified public accountant title appears.
4. The board shall charge an application fee for initial
issuance or renewal of a certificate in an amount prescribed by
the board by rule.
5. An applicant for initial issuance or renewal of a
certificate shall list in the application all states in which
the applicant has applied for or holds a certificate, license,
or permit and list any past denial, revocation, or suspension
of a certificate, license, or permit. A holder of or applicant
for a certificate under this section shall notify the board
in writing, within thirty days after its occurrence, of any
issuance, denial, revocation, or suspension of a certificate,
license, or permit by another state.
6. 2. The board, by rule, shall require as a condition for
renewal of a certificate under this section, by any certificate
holder who performs compilation services for the public other
than through a certified public accounting firm or licensed
public accounting firm, that such individual undergo, no more
frequently than once every three years, a peer an attest and
compilation services review conducted in such manner as the
board shall by rule specify, and such review shall include
verification that such individual has met the competency
requirements set out in professional standards for such
services. The provisions of section 542.7, subsections 10, 11,
and 12, shall apply to the peer attest and compilation services
review required in this subsection.
Sec. 150. Section 542.7, subsections 2, 5, and 6, Code 2026,
are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 151. Section 542.7, subsection 8, paragraphs a and b,
Code 2026, are amended to read as follows:
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-48- ss/ko 48/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a. The board, by rule, shall require as a condition
of renewal of a permit to practice as a certified public
accounting firm, that an applicant undergo, no more frequently
than once every three years, a peer an attest and compilation
services review conducted in such manner as the board
specifies. The review shall include a verification that any
individual in the firm who is responsible for supervising
attest and compilation services and who signs or authorizes
someone to sign the accountant’s report on behalf of the firm
meets the competency requirements set forth in the professional
standards for such services.
b. Such rules shall include reasonable provision for
compliance by an applicant showing that the applicant,
within the preceding three years, has undergone a peer an
attest and compilation services review that is a satisfactory
equivalent to the peer review required under this subsection.
An applicant’s completion of a peer review program endorsed
or supported by the American institute of certified public
accountants, or other substantially similar review as
determined by the board, satisfies the requirements of this
subsection.
Sec. 152. Section 542.7, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. The applicant does not engage in, and does not intend to
engage in during the following year, financial reporting areas
of practice, including but not limited to audits, compilations,
and reviews. An applicant granted a waiver pursuant to this
paragraph shall immediately notify the board if the applicant
engages in such practice, and shall be subject to peer an
attest and compilation services review.
Sec. 153. Section 542.7, subsections 10, 11, and 12, Code
2026, are amended to read as follows:
10. a. Peer Attest and compilation review records are
privileged and confidential, and are not subject to discovery,
subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion. Peer Attest
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-49- ss/ko 49/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
and compilation review records are not admissible in evidence
in a judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceeding.
Unless the subject of a peer an attest and compilation review
timely objects in writing to the administering entity of
the peer attest and compilation services review program,
the administering entity shall make available to the board
within thirty days of the issuance of the peer attest and
compilation services review acceptance letter the final peer
attest and compilation review report or such peer attest and
compilation review records as are designated by the peer
attest and compilation services review program in which the
administering entity participates. The subject of a peer an
attest and compilation services review may voluntarily submit
the final peer attest and compilation review report directly
to the board. Information or documents discoverable from
sources other than a peer an attest and compilation review
team do not become nondiscoverable from such other sources
because they are made available to or are in the possession of
a peer an attest and compilation review team. Information or
documents publicly available from the American institute of
certified public accountants relating to quality or peer review
are not privileged or confidential under this subsection. A
person or organization participating in the peer an attest
and compilation services review process shall not testify as
to the findings, recommendations, evaluations, or opinions of
a peer an attest and compilation review team in a judicial,
administrative, or arbitration proceeding.
b. However, notwithstanding any provision of this subsection
to the contrary, peer attest and compilation review reports
concerning the office of auditor of state shall be considered a
public record pursuant to chapter 22.
11. A person is not liable as a result of an act, omission,
or decision made in connection with the person’s service on a
peer an attest and compilation review team, unless the act,
omission, or decision is made with actual malice. A person
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-50- ss/ko 50/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
is not liable as a result of providing information to a peer
an attest and compilation review team, or for disclosure of
privileged matters to a peer an attest and compilation review
team.
12. The costs of the peer an attest and compilation services
review shall be paid by the applicant.
Sec. 154. Section 542.8, subsection 1, paragraph b,
unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
The applicant has satisfactorily completed the examination
prescribed in subsection 2 by the board by rule after having
met one of the following:
Sec. 155. Section 542.8, subsections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 9,
10, 11, 14, and 15, Code 2026, are amended by striking the
subsections.
Sec. 156. Section 542.8, subsections 17, 19, 20, 21, and 22,
Code 2026, are amended to read as follows:
17. The board, by rule, shall require as a condition of
renewal of a permit to practice as a licensed public accounting
firm, that an applicant undergo, no more frequently than once
every three years, a peer an attest and compilation services
review conducted in such manner as the board specifies. The
review shall include verification that any individual in the
firm who is responsible for supervising compilation services
and who signs or authorizes someone to sign the accountant’s
report on a financial statement on behalf of the firm meets
the competency requirements set forth in the professional
standards for such services. Such rules shall include
reasonable provision for compliance by an applicant showing
that the applicant, within the preceding three years, has
undergone a peer an attest and compilation services review
that is a satisfactory equivalent to the peer attest and
compilation services review required under this subsection.
An applicant’s completion of a peer an attest and compilation
services review program endorsed or supported by the national
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-51- ss/ko 51/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
society of accountants, or other substantially similar review
as determined by the board, satisfies the requirements of this
subsection.
19. Peer Attest and compilation review records are
privileged and confidential, and are not subject to discovery,
subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion. Peer Attest and
compilation review records are not admissible in evidence in a
judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceeding. Unless
the subject of a peer an attest and compilation services
review timely objects in writing to the administering entity
of the peer attest and compilation services review program,
the administering entity shall make available to the board
within thirty days of the issuance of the peer attest and
compilation services review acceptance letter the final peer
attest and compilation review report or such peer attest and
compilation review records as are designated by the peer
attest and compilation services review program in which the
administering entity participates. The subject of a peer an
attest and compilation services review may voluntarily submit
the final peer attest and compilation review report directly to
the board. Information or documents discoverable from sources
other than a peer an attest and compilation review team do not
become nondiscoverable from such other sources because they are
made available to or are in the possession of a peer an attest
and compilation review team. Information or documents publicly
available from the national society of accountants relating to
quality or peer attest and compilation services review are not
privileged or confidential under this subsection. A person or
organization participating in the peer attest and compilation
services review process shall not testify as to the findings,
recommendations, evaluations, or opinions of a peer an attest
and compilation review team in a judicial, administrative, or
arbitration proceeding.
20. A person is not liable as a result of an act, omission,
or decision made in connection with the person’s service in a
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-52- ss/ko 52/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
peer an attest and compilation review team, unless the act,
omission, or decision is made with actual malice. A person
is not liable as a result of providing information to a peer
an attest and compilation review team, or for disclosure of
privileged matters to a peer an attest and compilation review
team.
21. The costs of the peer attest and compilation services
review shall be paid by the applicant.
22. The board, by rule, shall require as a condition for
renewal of a license under this section by any license holder
who performs compilation services for the public other than
through a licensed public accounting firm or a certified
public accounting firm, that such individual undergo, no more
frequently than once every three years, a peer an attest and
compilation services review conducted in such manner as the
board shall by rule specify, and such review shall include
verification that such individual has met the competency
requirements set out in professional standards for such
services.
Sec. 157. Section 542.8, subsection 18, paragraph a, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
a. The applicant does not engage in, and does not intend
to engage in during the following year, financial reporting
areas of practice, including but not limited to compilations.
An applicant granted a waiver pursuant to this paragraph shall
immediately notify the board if the applicant engages in such
practice, and shall be subject to peer attest and compilation
services review.
Sec. 158. Section 542.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
542.9 Appointment of secretary of state as agent.
Application for Issuance of a certificate under section
542.6, or application for a license under section 542.8, a
permit to practice under section 542.7, or a certificate under
section 542.19 by a person or a firm not a resident of this
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-53- ss/ko 53/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
state constitutes appointment of the secretary of state as
the applicant’s agent upon whom process may be served in any
action or proceeding against the applicant arising out of
a transaction or operation connected with or incidental to
services performed by the applicant while a licensee within
this state.
Sec. 159. Section 542.10, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
After notice and hearing pursuant to section 542.11, the
board may revoke, suspend for a period of time not to exceed
two years, or refuse to renew a license; reprimand, censure,
or limit the scope of practice of any licensee; impose an
administrative penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars
per violation against an individual licensee or ten thousand
dollars per violation against a firm licensee; require remedial
actions; or place any licensee on probation; all with or
without terms, conditions, and in combinations of remedies, for
any one or more of the following reasons:
Sec. 160. Section 542.10, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. In lieu of or in addition to any remedy specifically
provided in subsection 1, the board may require a licensee to
satisfy a peer an attest and compilation services review or
desk review process on such terms as the board may specify,
satisfactorily complete a continuing education program, or such
additional remedies as the board may specify by rule.
Sec. 161. Section 542.13, subsection 13, paragraph c, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
c. Undergoes, no less frequently than once every three
years, a peer an attest and compilation services review
conducted in a manner as specified by the board. The review
shall include verification that such individual has met the
competency requirements set out in professional standards for
such services.
Sec. 162. Section 542.14, subsections 1 and 5, Code 2026,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-54- ss/ko 54/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 163. Section 542.14, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. In addition to a criminal penalty provided for in
section 542.15 chapter 147, the board may issue an order to
require compliance with section 542.13 or 542.20 or to revoke a
practice privilege under section 542.20, and may impose a civil
penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each offense
upon a person who is not a licensee under this chapter and who
engages in conduct prohibited by section 542.13 or 542.20.
Each day of a continued violation constitutes a separate
offense. The board may impose a penalty up to ten thousand
dollars per violation against a firm that violates section
542.13 or 542.20.
Sec. 164. Section 542.17, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. A licensee shall not voluntarily disclose information
communicated to the licensee by a client relating to and
in connection with services rendered to the client by the
licensee, except with the permission of the client, or an
heir, successor, or personal representative of the client.
Such information is deemed to be confidential. However, this
section shall not be construed as prohibiting the disclosure of
information required to be disclosed by the standards of the
public accounting profession in reporting on the examination of
financial statements or in the performance of an attest service
or as prohibiting disclosures in a court proceeding, in an
investigation or proceeding under this chapter or chapter 272C,
in an ethical investigation conducted by a private professional
organization, in the course of a peer an attest and compilation
services review, to another person active in the licensee’s
firm performing services for that client on a need-to-know
basis, to persons associated with the investigative entity who
need this information for the sole purpose of assuring quality
control, or as otherwise required by law.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-55- ss/ko 55/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 165. Section 542.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Subject to section 542.17, all statements, records,
schedules, working papers, and memoranda made by a licensee or
a partner, shareholder, officer, director, member, manager,
or employee of a licensee, incident to, or in the course of,
rendering services to a client, except reports submitted by
the licensee to the client and except for records that are
part of the client’s records, are the property of the licensee
in the absence of an express agreement between the licensee
and the client to the contrary. Such statement, record,
schedule, working paper, or memorandum shall not be sold,
transferred, or bequeathed, without the consent of the client
or the client’s personal representative or assignee, to anyone
other than a surviving partner, stockholder, or member of
the licensee, or any combined or merged firm or successor in
interest to the licensee. This section shall not be construed
as prohibiting a temporary transfer of working papers or other
material necessary in the course of carrying out peer attest
and compilation services reviews or as otherwise interfering
with the disclosure of information pursuant to section 542.17.
Sec. 166. Section 542.19, subsection 1, paragraph c,
subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended by striking the
subparagraph.
Sec. 167. Section 542.20, subsection 5, paragraph e, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
e. The firm shall comply with the ownership and peer attest
and compilation services review requirements of section 542.7.
Sec. 168. Section 542.20, subsection 6, paragraphs c and d,
Code 2026, are amended to read as follows:
c. An individual who provides attest services in Iowa or
for a client having a home office in Iowa must practice through
a certified public accounting firm that is licensed under
section 542.7, or through a certified public accounting firm
that is validly licensed in the state of its principal place of
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-56- ss/ko 56/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
business and complies with the ownership and peer attest and
compilation services review requirements of section 542.7.
d. An individual who provides compilation services in Iowa
or for a client having a home office in Iowa must comply with
the peer attest and compilation services review provisions of
section 542.6, subsection 6, or provide such services through a
certified public accounting firm, a licensed public accounting
firm, or substantially equivalent firm that is validly licensed
in the firm’s principal place of business and is subject to
the peer attest and compilation services review and ownership
provisions of section 542.7 or 542.8.
Sec. 169. Section 542.20, subsection 7, paragraph c, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
c. Agrees to supply the board, upon the board’s request
and without subpoena, such information or records as licensees
are similarly required to provide the board under this chapter
regarding themselves or, in the case of a firm, regarding
the individuals practicing through the firm, including
but not limited to licensure status in all jurisdictions;
qualifications for substantial equivalency reciprocity under
section 542.19, subsection 1, paragraph “a”, “b”, or “c”;
location of principal place of business and all other offices;
criminal and disciplinary background; malpractice settlements
and judgments; firm ownership and when applicable, information
regarding nonlicensee owners; whether public accounting
services are subject to peer attest and compilation services
review; proof of completion of peer attest and compilation
services review, when applicable; qualifications to supervise
attest services, when applicable; and timely response to
inquiries regarding complaints and investigations conducted
under this chapter.
Sec. 170. Section 542B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
542B.3 Engineering and land surveying examining board
created.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-57- ss/ko 57/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
An engineering and land surveying examining board is
created within the department of inspections, appeals, and
licensing. The board consists of three members who are
licensed professional engineers, two members who are licensed
professional land surveyors, and two members who are not
licensed professional engineers or licensed professional land
surveyors and who shall represent the general public. An
individual who is licensed as both a professional engineer and
a professional land surveyor may serve to satisfy the board
membership requirement for either a licensed professional
engineer or a licensed professional land surveyor, but not
both. Members shall be appointed by the governor subject
to confirmation by the senate. A licensed member shall
be actively engaged in the practice of engineering or land
surveying and shall have been so engaged for five years
preceding the appointment, the last two of which shall have
been in Iowa. Insofar as practicable, licensed engineer
members of the board shall be from different branches of the
profession of engineering. Professional associations or
societies composed of licensed engineers or licensed land
surveyors may recommend the names of potential board members
whose profession is representative of that association or
society to the governor. However, the governor is not bound by
the recommendations. A board member shall not be required to
be a member of any professional association or society composed
of professional engineers or professional land surveyors.
Sec. 171. Section 542B.15, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
542B.15 Examinations —— report required.
Examinations for licensure shall be given as often as
deemed necessary by the department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing, but no less than one time per year. The scope
of the examinations and the methods of procedure shall be
prescribed by the board. The identity of the person taking
the examination shall be concealed until after the examination
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-58- ss/ko 58/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
has been graded by the department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing. As soon as practicable after the close of
each examination, a report shall be filed in the office of
the secretary of the board by the department of inspections,
appeals, and licensing. The report shall show the action of
the board upon each application and the secretary of the board
shall notify each applicant of the result of the applicant’s
examination. Applicants who fail the examination once shall
be allowed to take the examination at the next scheduled
time. Thereafter, the applicant shall be allowed to take the
examination at the discretion of the board. An applicant who
has failed the examination may request in writing information
from the board concerning the applicant’s examination grade and
subject areas or questions which the applicant failed to answer
correctly, except that if the board administers a uniform,
standardized examination, the board shall only be required
to provide the examination grade and such other information
concerning the applicant’s examination results which are
available to the board.
Sec. 172. Section 542B.27, subsection 4, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
4. Before issuing an order under this section, the board
shall provide the person written notice and the opportunity to
request a hearing on the record. The hearing must be requested
within thirty days of the issuance of the notice and shall be
conducted in the same manner as provided in section 542B.22.
Sec. 173. Section 543B.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
543B.8 Real estate commission created —— staff.
1. A real estate commission is created within the department
of inspections, appeals, and licensing. The commission
consists of four members licensed under this chapter and one
member not licensed under this chapter and who shall represent
the general public. Commission members shall be appointed by
the governor subject to confirmation by the senate.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-59- ss/ko 59/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
2. No more than one member shall be appointed from a
county. A commission member shall not hold any other elective
or appointive state or federal office. At least one of the
licensed members shall be a licensed real estate salesperson,
except that if the licensed real estate salesperson becomes
a licensed real estate broker during a term of office,
that person may complete the term, but is not eligible for
reappointment on the commission as a licensed real estate
salesperson. A licensed member shall be actively engaged
in the real estate business. Professional associations or
societies of real estate brokers or real estate salespersons
may recommend the names of potential commission members to
the governor. However, the governor is not bound by their
recommendations. A commission member shall not be required to
be a member of any professional association or society composed
of real estate brokers or salespersons.
3. Appointments shall be for three-year terms and shall
commence and end as provided in section 69.19. A member
shall serve no more than three terms or nine years, whichever
is less. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term
by appointment of the governor and are subject to senate
confirmation.
4. A majority of the commission members constitutes a
quorum.
5. The director of the department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing shall hire and provide staff to assist the
commission with implementing this chapter and shall hire a
real estate education director to assist the commission in
administering education programs for the commission.
Sec. 174. Section 543B.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
543B.9 Rules.
The real estate commission may adopt rules to carry out and
administer the provisions of this chapter. The commission may
carry on a program of education of real estate practices and
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-60- ss/ko 60/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
matters relating to real estate. The commission shall adopt
rules necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 558A
relating to the disclosure of information before the transfer
of real estate.
Sec. 175. Section 543B.15, subsections 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6,
Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 176. Section 543B.15, subsections 2 and 9, Code 2026,
are amended to read as follows:
2. To qualify for a license as a real estate broker
or salesperson a person shall be eighteen years of age or
over. However, an applicant is not ineligible because of
citizenship, sex, race, religion, marital status, or national
origin, although the application form may require citizenship
information.
9. An applicant for an initial real estate broker’s or
salesperson’s license shall be subject to a national criminal
history check through the federal bureau of investigation
pursuant to rules adopted by the department pursuant to
chapter 17A. The commission shall request the criminal
history check and shall provide the applicant’s fingerprints
to the department of public safety for submission through
the state criminal history repository to the federal bureau
of investigation. The applicant shall authorize release of
the results of the criminal history check to the real estate
commission. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of the
fingerprinting and criminal history check, if any. Unless the
criminal history check was completed within the two hundred
ten calendar days prior to the date the license application
is received by the real estate commission, the commission
shall reject and return the application to the applicant. The
commission shall process the application but hold delivery
of the license until the background check is complete. The
results of a criminal history check conducted pursuant to
this subsection shall not be considered a public record under
chapter 22.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-61- ss/ko 61/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 177. Section 543B.20, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
543B.20 Examination.
Examinations for a license shall be given as often as deemed
necessary by the real estate commission, but no less than one
time per year. Each applicant for a license must pass an
examination authorized by the commission and administered by
the commission or persons designated by the commission. The
examination shall be of scope and wording sufficient in the
judgment of the commission to establish the competency of the
applicant to act as a real estate broker or salesperson in a
manner to protect the interests of the public. An examination
for a real estate broker shall be of a more exacting nature
than that for a real estate salesperson and require higher
standards of knowledge of real estate. The identity of the
persons taking the examinations shall be concealed until after
the examination has been graded. A person who fails to pass
either examination once may immediately apply to take the next
available examination. Thereafter, the applicant may take the
examination at the discretion of the commission. An applicant
who has failed either examination may request in writing
information from the commission concerning the applicant’s
examination grade and subject areas or questions which the
applicant failed to answer correctly, except that if the
commission administers a uniform, standardized examination, the
commission is only required to provide the examination grade
and other information concerning the applicant’s examination
results which is available to the commission.
Sec. 178. Section 543B.29, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code
2026, is amended to read as follows:
f. (1) Conviction of an offense included in section
543B.15, subsection 3 in violation of the laws of this state
or another jurisdiction of the United States. For purposes of
this section, “conviction” means a conviction for an indictable
offense and includes the court’s acceptance of a guilty plea,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-62- ss/ko 62/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
a deferred judgment from the time of entry of the deferred
judgment until the time the defendant is discharged by the
court without entry of judgment, or other finding of guilt by
a court of competent jurisdiction. A copy of the record of
conviction, guilty plea, deferred judgment, or other finding of
guilt is conclusive evidence.
(1) A licensed real estate broker or salesperson shall
notify the commission of the licensee’s conviction of an
offense included in section 543B.15, subsection 3, paragraph
“a”, within ten days of the conviction. Notification of a
conviction for an offense which is classified as a felony shall
result in the immediate suspension of a license pending the
outcome of a hearing conducted pursuant to section 543B.35 to
determine the nature of the disciplinary action, if any, the
commission will impose on the licensee. The hearing shall be
conducted within thirty days of the licensee’s notification to
the commission, and the commission’s decision shall be provided
to the licensee no later than thirty days following the
hearing. The failure of the licensee to notify the commission
of the conviction within ten days of the date of the conviction
is sufficient grounds for revocation of the license.
(2) The commission, when considering the revocation
or suspension of a license pursuant to this paragraph “f”,
shall consider the nature of the offense; any aggravating or
extenuating circumstances which are documented; the time lapsed
since the conduct or conviction; the rehabilitation, treatment,
or restitution performed by the licensee; and any other factors
the commission deems relevant. Character references may be
required but shall not be obtained from licensed real estate
brokers or salespersons.
Sec. 179. Section 543B.29, subsections 2 and 4, Code 2026,
are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 180. Section 543B.31, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
543B.31 Place of business —— branch license.
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-63- ss/ko 63/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Every real estate broker, except as provided in section
543B.22, shall maintain a place of business in this state. A
real estate broker may maintain more than one place of business
within the state and a broker may be the designated broker
of more than one branch office within the state. If the
real estate broker maintains more than one place of business
within the state, a duplicate license shall be issued to such
broker for each branch office maintained. A fee determined by
the real estate commission shall be paid for each duplicate
license.
Sec. 181. Section 543B.34, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
The real estate commission may upon its own motion and
shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person,
if the complaint together with evidence, documentary or
otherwise, presented in connection with the complaint makes
out a prima facie case, request commission staff or any other
duly authorized representative or designee to investigate the
actions of any real estate broker, real estate salesperson, or
other person who assumes to act in such capacity within this
state. The commission may assess civil penalties against any
person or entity, and may suspend or revoke a license issued
under this chapter at any time if the licensee has by false
or fraudulent representation obtained a license, or if the
licensee or other person assuming to act in the capacity of
a real estate broker or real estate salesperson, except for
those actions exempt pursuant to section 543B.7, is found to be
guilty of any of the following:
Sec. 182. Section 543B.34, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 183. Section 543B.46, subsections 3 and 6, Code 2026,
are amended to read as follows:
3. Each broker required to maintain a trust account pursuant
to this section shall authorize the real estate commission
department of inspections, appeals, and licensing to examine
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-64- ss/ko 64/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
each trust account and shall obtain the certification of the
federally insured depository institution attesting to each
trust account and consenting to the examination and audit
of each account by a duly authorized representative of the
commission. The certification and consent shall be furnished
on forms prescribed by the commission. This subsection does
not apply to an individual farm account maintained in the
name of the owner or owners for the purpose of conducting
ongoing farm business whether it is conducted by the farm owner
or by an agent or farm manager when the account is part of
a farm management agreement between the owner and agent or
manager. This subsection also does not apply to an individual
property management account maintained in the name of the
owner or owners for the purpose of conducting ongoing property
management whether it is conducted by the property owner or
by an agent or manager when the account is part of a property
management agreement between the owner and agent or manager.
6. The commission department of inspections, appeals, and
licensing shall verify on a test basis, a random sampling
of the brokers, corporations, professional corporations,
professional limited liability companies, and partnerships
for their trust account compliance. The commission may upon
reasonable cause, or as a part of or after an investigation,
request or order a special report.
Sec. 184. Section 543B.47, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. The real estate commission shall adopt rules requiring
as a condition of licensure that all real estate licensees,
except those who hold inactive licenses, carry errors and
omissions insurance covering all activities contemplated under
this chapter. The rules shall provide for administration of
the insurance requirements of this section within the multiyear
licensing structure required by section 543B.28. However,
the The rules shall require licensees to submit evidence of
compliance with this section within twenty calendar days of
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-65- ss/ko 65/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
the commission’s request, which may be made on a test basis, a
random basis, or upon reasonable cause to question a licensee’s
compliance.
Sec. 185. Section 543B.62, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection 2, the duties of a
licensee specified in this chapter, chapter 147, or chapter
272C, or in rules adopted pursuant to this chapter supersede
any fiduciary duties of a licensee to a party to a transaction
based on common law principles of agency to the extent that
those common law fiduciary duties are inconsistent with the
duties specified in this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to
this chapter.
Sec. 186. Section 543D.4, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. A real estate appraiser examining board is established
within the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing.
The board consists of five members, one of whom shall be a
public member and four of whom shall be certified real estate
appraisers.
Sec. 187. Section 543D.4, subsections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8,
9, and 10, Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 188. Section 543D.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
543D.9 Education and experience requirement.
The board shall determine what real estate appraisal or real
estate appraisal review experience and what education shall be
required to provide appropriate assurance that an applicant for
certification is competent to perform the certified appraisal
work which is within the scope of practice defined by the
board. All experience required for initial certification shall
be performed as a registered associate real estate appraiser
acting under the direct supervision of a certified real estate
appraiser who meets the supervisory requirements established
by applicable federal authorities or federal law, rule, or
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-66- ss/ko 66/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
policy in effect at the time the hours of experience are
claimed, except as the board may provide by rule. Subject
to requirements or limitations established by applicable
federal authorities or federal law, rule, or policy, hours
qualifying for experience in a bordering another state will
be considered qualifying hours for experience in this state
without requiring a waiver or authorization from the board
in accordance with rules and standards adopted by the board.
Qualifying hours completed in a bordering another state shall
be under the direct supervision of a certified real estate
appraiser with active certification in that bordering state.
The board shall prescribe a required minimum number of tested
hours of education relating to the provisions of this chapter,
the uniform appraisal standards, and other rules issued in
accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 189. Section 543D.21, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 190. Section 544A.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. The architectural examining board is created within the
department of inspections, appeals, and licensing. The board
consists of four members who possess a license issued under
section 544A.9, and one member who does not possess a license
issued under section 544A.9 and who shall represent the general
public. Members shall be appointed by the governor subject to
confirmation by the senate.
Sec. 191. Section 544A.1, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 192. Section 544A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
544A.5 Duties.
The architectural examining board shall enforce this
chapter, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the
examination of applicants for the license provided by this
chapter, and shall, after due public notice, hold meetings each
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-67- ss/ko 67/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
year for the purpose of examining applicants for licensure
and the transaction of business pertaining to the affairs of
the board. Examinations shall be given as often as deemed
necessary, but not less than annually. Action at a meeting
shall not be taken without the affirmative votes of a majority
of the members of the board. The director of the department
of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall hire and provide
staff to assist the board with implementing this chapter.
Sec. 193. Section 544A.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Any person may apply for a license or may apply to take
an examination for licensure under this chapter. The board
shall not require that the application contain a photograph of
the applicant.
Sec. 194. Section 544A.15, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 195. Section 544A.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
2. “Board” means the architectural examining board
established created in section 544A.1.
Sec. 196. Section 544A.29, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
544A.29 Rules.
The board may adopt rules consistent with this chapter for
the administration and enforcement of pursuant to chapter 17A
to administer and enforce this chapter and may prescribe forms
to be issued. The rules may include, but are not limited
to, standards and criteria for licensure, license renewal,
professional conduct, misconduct, and discipline. Violation
of a rule of conduct is grounds for disciplinary action or
reprimand or probation at the discretion of the board. The
board may enter into a consent order with an architect which
acknowledges an architect’s violation and agreement to refrain
from any further violation. A willful or repeated violation
of a rule of conduct is grounds for disciplinary action as
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-68- ss/ko 68/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
provided in section 544A.13.
Sec. 197. Section 544B.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. “Board” means the landscape architectural examining board
established created pursuant to section 544B.3.
Sec. 198. Section 544B.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
544B.3 Landscape architectural examining board created.
1. A landscape architectural examining board is created
within the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing.
The board consists of five members who are professional
landscape architects and two members who are not professional
landscape architects and who shall represent the general
public. Members shall be appointed by the governor, subject
to confirmation by the senate. Four of the five professional
members shall be actively engaged in the practice of landscape
architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in
an accredited college or university, and shall have been so
engaged for five years preceding appointment, the last two of
which shall have been in Iowa. One of the five professional
members shall be actively engaged in the practice of landscape
architecture or the teaching of landscape architecture in an
accredited college or university, and may have been so engaged
for fewer than five years preceding appointment but at least
one year preceding appointment. Associations or societies
composed of professional landscape architects may recommend the
names of potential board members to the governor. However,
the governor is not bound by the recommendations. A board
member shall not be required to be a member of any professional
association or society composed of professional landscape
architects.
2. Appointments shall be for three-year terms and shall
commence and end as provided in section 69.19. Vacancies shall
be filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the governor
and are subject to senate confirmation. Members shall serve no
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-69- ss/ko 69/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
more than three terms or nine years, whichever is less.
Sec. 199. Section 544B.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
544B.5 Duties.
The board shall enforce this chapter and shall make rules
for the examination of applicants for licensure. The board
shall keep a record of its proceedings. The board shall adopt
an official seal which shall be affixed to all certificates
of licensure granted. The board may make other rules, not
inconsistent with law, as necessary for the proper performance
of its duties. The board shall maintain a roster showing the
name, place of business, and residence, and the date and number
of the certificate of licensure of every professional landscape
architect in this state. The director of the department of
inspections, appeals, and licensing shall hire and provide
staff to assist the board in implementing this chapter.
Sec. 200. Section 544B.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
544B.8 Examination.
1. A person applying for a certificate of licensure as a
professional landscape architect shall satisfactorily pass an
examination in technical and professional subjects prescribed
by the board. The board may adopt the uniform standardized
examination and grading procedures of a national certification
body recognized by the board. The examination may be conducted
by representatives of the board. The identity of a person
taking the examination shall be concealed until after the
examination is graded. The fee for examination shall be based
on the annual cost of administering the examinations. The
public members of the board shall be allowed to participate in
administrative, clerical, or ministerial functions incident to
giving the examination, but shall not determine the content of
the examination or determine the correctness of the answers.
2. An applicant who has failed the examination may
request in writing information from the board concerning the
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-70- ss/ko 70/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
applicant’s examination grade and subject areas or questions
which the applicant failed to answer correctly, except that
if the board administers a uniform, standardized examination,
the board shall only be required to provide the examination
grade and such other information concerning the applicant’s
examination results which are available to the board.
Sec. 201. Section 544B.9, subsection 1, unnumbered
paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows:
Any person may apply for a certificate of licensure or
may apply to take an examination for such certification.
Applications for licensure shall be on forms prescribed and
furnished by the board, shall contain statements made under
oath, showing the applicant’s education and detail summary of
the applicant’s pertinent practical landscape architectural
work and experience. The board shall not require that a recent
photograph of the applicant be attached to the application
form. An applicant shall not be ineligible for licensure on
the basis of membership in any protected class under chapter
216. The board may consider the past felony record of an
applicant only if the felony conviction relates directly to
the practice of landscape architecture. Character references
may be required but shall not be obtained from professional
landscape architects. Each applicant for licensure as
a professional landscape architect shall meet one of the
following requirements:
Sec. 202. Section 544B.20, subsection 5, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
5. To apply to the business conducted in this state by any
planner, agriculturist, soil conservationist, horticulturist,
tree expert, arborist, forester, nursery or landscape nursery
person, gardener, landscape gardener, landscape contractor,
garden or lawn caretaker, tiling contractor, grader or
cultivator of land, golf course designer or contractor,
or similar business. However, such person shall not use
the designation landscape architect or any title or device
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-71- ss/ko 71/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
indicating or representing that such person is a professional
landscape architect or is practicing landscape architecture
unless such person is licensed under the provisions of section
544B.11 pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 203. Section 544C.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
1. An interior design examining board is established within
the department. The board consists of seven members: five
members who are interior designers who are registered under
this chapter and who have been in the active practice of
registered interior design for not less than five years, the
last two of which shall have been in Iowa; and two members who
are not registered under this chapter and who shall represent
the general public. Members shall be appointed by the governor
subject to confirmation by the senate.
Sec. 204. Section 544C.2, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026,
are amended by striking the subsections.
Sec. 205. Section 544C.3, subsection 1, paragraphs e and f,
Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs.
Sec. 206. Section 544C.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 207. Section 710A.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as
follows:
710A.3 Affirmative defense.
It shall be an affirmative defense, in addition to any other
affirmative defenses for which a defendant may be eligible,
to a prosecution for a criminal violation of section 152C.5B,
152C.5C, 157.4A, 157.4B, 710A.2, 710A.2A, or 710A.2B, that the
violation directly resulted from the defendant’s status as a
victim of any human trafficking crime under chapter 710A.
Sec. 208. REPEAL. Sections 148.2B, 148.7, 148.8, 148.8A,
148.9, 148.10, 148.12, 148.14, 148C.13, 149.7, 151.12, 152.2,
152.9, 152.11, 152D.9, 153.19, 154B.8, 155.14, 155.19, 155A.5,
155A.39, 157.7, 542.11, 542.12, 542.15, 542.16, 542B.4, 542B.6,
542B.7, 542B.8, 542B.9, 542B.12, 542B.13, 542B.17, 542B.18,
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-72- ss/ko 72/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
542B.19, 542B.22, 542B.24, 542B.30, 542B.31, 542B.32, 543B.12,
543B.13, 543B.14, 543B.16, 543B.18, 543B.19, 543B.21, 543B.22,
543B.23, 543B.27, 543B.28, 543B.30, 543B.32, 543B.35, 543B.36,
543B.37, 543B.38, 543B.39, 543B.40, 543B.41, 543B.42, 543B.43,
543B.44, 543B.49, 543B.50, 543B.51, 543B.52, 543B.53, 543D.6,
543D.7, 543D.14, 544A.2, 544A.3, 544A.9, 544A.10, 544A.11,
544A.12, 544A.20, 544A.25, 544A.26, 544A.27, 544B.4, 544B.7,
544B.10, 544B.11, 544B.13, 544B.14, 544B.15, 544B.16, 544B.17,
544B.18, 544B.19, 544C.4, 544C.6, 544C.7, 544C.9, and 544C.11,
Code 2026, are repealed.
Sec. 209. APPLICABILITY.
1. The following apply to licenses issued pursuant to
chapter 103 on or after the effective date of this Act and on or
after the date on which the department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing adopts rules setting the term and renewal
procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 103:
a. The section of this Act amending section 103.18.
b. The section of this Act amending section 103.19,
subsections 1 and 2.
2. The following applies to licenses issued pursuant to
chapter 105 on or after the effective date of this Act and
on or after the date on which the department of inspections,
appeals, and licensing adopts rules setting the term and
renewal procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 105:
the section of this Act amending section 105.20, subsection 1.
3. The following applies to licenses issued pursuant to
chapter 147 on or after the effective date of this Act and
on or after the date on which the department of inspections,
appeals, and licensing adopts rules setting the term and
renewal procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 147:
the section of this Act amending section 147.10.
4. The following apply to licenses issued pursuant to
chapter 157 on or after the effective date of this Act and on or
after the date on which the department of inspections, appeals,
and licensing adopts rules setting the term and renewal
LSB 5537DP (10) 91
-73- ss/ko 73/83

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 157:
a. The sections of this Act amending section 157.8.
b. The section of this Act amending section 157.11.
5. The following applies to licenses issued pursuant to
chapter 542 on or after the effective date of this Act and
on or after the date on which the department of inspections,
appeals, and licensing adopts rules setting the term and
renewal procedures for licenses issued pursuant to chapter 542:
the sections of this Act amending section 542.7.